Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-710.11
Sickness and accident insurance; construction of policies.

A policy of sickness and accident insurance delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this state in violation of sections 44-709 to 44-767 shall be held valid but shall be construed as provided in such sections. When any provision in a policy subject to such sections is in conflict with any provision of such sections, the rights, duties, and obligations of the insurer, the insured, and the beneficiary shall be governed by the provisions of such sections.

Laws 1957, c. 188, § 12, p. 657;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 141.